California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15058.

A revoked license or branch officer certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in the amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15059.

A license or branch office certificate which is not renewed within one year after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter.

The holder of the license or certificate may obtain a new license or certificate only on compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original license or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15059.1.

(a) An individual who holds a public insurance adjuster license and who is not exempt under subdivision (b) shall satisfactorily complete a minimum of 24 hours, of which three hours are to be in ethics, of continuing education courses pertinent to the duties and responsibilities of a public insurance adjuster license, to be reported to the insurance commissioner on a biennial basis in conjunction with his or her license renewal cycle.

(b) This section shall not apply to:

(1) A licensee not licensed for one full year prior to the end of the applicable continuing education biennium.

(2) A licensee holding a nonresident public insurance adjuster license who has met the continuing education requirements of his or her designated state or residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 32.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15059.2.

A person who fails to meet the requirements imposed by Section 15059.1, and who has not been granted an extension of time by the commissioner within which to comply, shall have his or her license placed on inactive status until he or she demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that he or she has complied with all of the requirements of this article and all other applicable law. A licensee placed on inactive status may not perform the activities described in Section 1631. If a person cannot perform the requirements of this article due to a disability or inactivity due to special circumstances, the commissioner shall provide a procedure for the person to place his or her license on inactive status until the person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that he or she has complied with all of the
 requirements of this article for the period of disability or inactivity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 22.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15060.

The amount of fees prescribed by this chapter is that in the following schedule:

(a) The fee for the qualifying examination for an original license is sixty-two dollars ($62).

(b) The application fee for an original branch office certificate is thirty-five dollars ($35).

(c) The fee for an original license application is two hundred forty dollars ($240). If the license will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the license is issued.

(d) The renewal fees are as follows:

(1) For a license as a public insurance adjuster, two hundred forty dollars ($240).

(2) For a branch office certificate, fifty dollars ($50).

(e) The fee for replacing an identification card is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(f) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of expiration.

(g) The fee for reexamination of an applicant is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 23.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15061.

The department shall receive and account for all moneys derived from the operation of this chapter and, at the end of each month, shall report such money to the Controller and shall pay it to the Treasurer, to the credit of the Insurance Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15062.

Application or license fees shall not be refunded pursuant to Section 1751.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 24.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Emergency Disaster Assessment [16000. - 16032.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16000. - 16002.]

16000.

As used in this chapter, “state of emergency” means a state of emergency or local emergency as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

This chapter shall apply to all insurers insuring real or personal property in the state, and any other classes of insurers that the commissioner determines should participate in emergency disaster preparation and assistance under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

The purpose and function of the disaster assessment teams is solely to determine the staffing and support needs of insurers in handling anticipated claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Emergency Disaster Assessment [16010. - 16016.]

16010.

In order to ensure an adequate response to disasters, the Legislature finds it necessary and appropriate to establish insurance disaster assessment teams.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.5.

The commissioner shall establish insurance disaster assessment teams in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16011.

(a) Each team shall consist of not more than seven insurance representatives. Insurers doing business in this state that want to participate in the insurance disaster assessment teams shall submit the names of qualified representatives to the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner may establish one or more insurance disaster assessment teams, and may provide for different teams for different locations and different types of disasters.

(c) The commissioner may assign a representative of the commissioner to accompany the team or teams. The representative shall complete the appropriate Standardized Emergency Management Systems training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16012.

Upon the occurrence of any state of emergency involving property damage, the commissioner may require any insurance disaster assessment team to assemble for the purpose of assessing the extent, type, and degree of insured damage involved in the emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16013.

State and local law enforcement officials shall permit an insurance disaster assessment team to have access to any disaster area as soon as determined safe and practical by the incident commander. The commissioner shall be responsible for the coordination and dispatch of insurance disaster assessment teams to disaster areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16014.

The insurance disaster assessment team may use any of the following techniques to assess the amount of damage:

(a) Ground surveying on foot or vehicle, or aerial surveying if necessary.

(b) Analysis of data provided by others.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16015.

The insurance disaster assessment team shall make a general assessment of the amount and types of damage suffered in an attempt to identify the overall scope of damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16016.

The insurance disaster assessment team shall compile its findings into a report and submit the report to the commissioner as soon as practical, but not more than five days after completion of the assessment unless authorized by the commissioner. The report shall be developed, in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner. The information shall be disseminated publicly, and shall be made available to local and state disaster organizations, and to the commissioner for distribution to insurers. These findings and information shall not be binding on any insured as to coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Adjuster Identification [16020. - 16022.]

16020.

The commissioner, in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services and other emergency service agencies, shall establish a method for identification of representatives of insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 398.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

16021.

(a) In accordance with the methods established under Section 16020, the commissioner shall issue identification badges to each insurer insuring property in the state. The insurer shall be responsible for the distribution of the identification badges to appropriate insurer representatives. The identification badges shall permit access to disaster areas as soon as determined safe and practical by the incident commander.

(b) The purpose of the identification badges is to enable the incident commander and state and local law enforcement officials to identify the representatives of insurers for purposes of access to disaster areas, and the badges shall not be used as identification for other purposes. The badges shall include in bold lettering larger than the other identifying information a statement that the bearer is not a state employee or public official, and does not possess any governmental authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16022.

The commissioner shall distribute identification badges to insurance adjusters for the purpose of identifying persons who should be given access to disaster areas. Every insurer shall maintain a list of adjusters that have been assigned to work in the disaster area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Coordination of Emergency Operations [16030. - 16032.]

16030.

(a) The commissioner, in cooperation with insurers, the Office of Emergency Services, and other emergency service agencies, shall establish procedures for the coordination of efforts between insurers and their representatives and those of emergency response agencies.

(b) The commissioner shall assign a representative of the commissioner to work within the state’s regional emergency operations centers. The representative shall complete the appropriate Standardized Emergency Management Systems training.

(c) All insurance disaster assessment team members shall complete the appropriate Standardized Emergency Management Systems
 training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 399.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

16032.

Any privately owned or operated resources hired by an insurer for the purpose of protecting structures endangered by fire or performing firefighting duties shall report to the incident commander or his or her designee immediately upon arriving at the site of a fire. Those resources must obey all directions, including evacuation orders, given by the incident commander or his or her designee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   (AB 1214)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

